Mississippi, session 2026, HB4120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Charles Kenneth Landrum of Jones County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Uttering Forgery in Jones County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced on January 23, 2008, to serve one (1) year for each count in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released due to expiration of sentence on October 10, 2010.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.